Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.84.020

Violations by officers.

Every officer who willfully violates RCW 29A.56.110 through 29A.56.270, for the violation of which no penalty is prescribed in this title or who willfully fails to comply with the provisions of RCW 29A.56.110 through 29A.56.270 is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

[ 2011 c 10 s 67; 2003 c 111 s 2102; 1965 c 9 s 29.82.210. Prior: 1953 c 113 s 1; prior: 1913 c 146 s 16, part; RRS s 5365, part. Formerly RCW 29.82.210.]

NOTES:

Notice to registered poll voters—Elections by mail—2011 c 10: See note following RCW 29A.04.008.